Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5848.01
Certificate of need; period valid; renewal.

A new or modified certificate of need shall be valid for a period of three years from the date of issuance and may be renewed at the expiration of such period for up to one year if the holder of the certificate establishes that the holder is meeting the timetable or making a good faith effort to meet it. The department shall give written notice to an applicant for a renewal certificate of its decision within thirty days after receipt of an application. Such decision shall be considered a final decision of the department for purposes of appeal. If the decision is not appealed, it shall be final as of the date issued.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 67;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 53;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-5867;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 31;

Laws 2026, LB437, § 1.
July 18, 2026